src/fst/orthography/punctrelax.xfscript
# define equivalence classes for hyphen and apostrophe
# and allow any variant to occur 

# hyphen-like symbols; NOT a full list

define hyphen [ "-" ];
define doublehyphen[ %-%- ];
define endash [ – ];
define emdash [ — ];
define horizontalbar [ ― ];
define minus [ − ];           # from sme allcaps.xfscript

define someminus[ hyphen (->) [ doublehyphen | endash | emdash | horizontalbar | minus ]];

# apostrophe-like symbols; NOT a full list

define apostrophe ["'"] ;   # = prime symbol
define acuteaccent ["´"] ;  
define graveaccent ["`"] ;  
define aponine [’|❜] ;  
define aporevnine [‛] ;
define aposix [‘|❛|ʻ] ;   

define someapo [apostrophe (->) [ acuteaccent | graveaccent | aponine | aporevnine | aposix]] ;

# quotation marks (from generated_files/punctuation.lexc); NOT a full list
define quotmark [%"] ;
define fancyquot  [ « | » | ‹ | › | “ | ” | „ | ‟ | ❝ | ❞ | ❠ |〝 | 〞| 〟] ;
define somequot [quotmark (->) fancyquot] ;

define relax [someminus .o. someapo .o. somequot] ;

regex relax ;
